Arkansas, session 2025, SB498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-14-412(a) and (b), concerning records of
the Office of Motor Vehicle, are amended to read as follows:
27-14-412. Records.
(a)(1)(A) All records of the Office of Motor Vehicle, other than those
declared by law to be confidential for the use of the Office of Motor
Vehicle, shall be open to public inspection during office hours The Secretary
of the Department of Finance and Administration and officers of the Office of
Motor Vehicle designated by the secretary may prepare under the seal of the
office a:
(i) Certified copy of a motor vehicle registration
record maintained by the office; or
(ii) Noncertified electronic copy of a motor vehicle
registration record maintained by the Office of Motor Vehicle
(B) A copy of a motor vehicle registration record under
*MBM088*
03/18/2025 9:13:56 AM MBM088

SB498
subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section may be delivered to:
(i) The person who is a registered owner of the
motor vehicle;
(ii) A person who has been authorized in writing by
the registered owner of the motor vehicle to obtain the motor vehicle
registration record;
(iii) A federal, state, or local court for use in
connection with a civil, criminal, administrative, or arbitral proceeding,
including without limitation use:
(a) In connection with the service of process;
(b) In connection with the execution or
enforcement of a judgment or order; or
(c) Pursuant to an order of a federal, state,
or local court;
(iv) A duly licensed attorney at law in response to
a subpoena properly issued in a federal, state, or local court action; or
(v) A government agency or law enforcement agency
for use in carrying out its function.
(2) The use of lists or other aggregations of compilations of
motor vehicle registration information is restricted to safety recall
notification programs involving motor vehicles and motor vehicle equipment,
other federal and state agency programs, research and statistics involving
motor vehicles in which individual identities are not published, disclosed,
or for any other purpose authorized by the Driver's Privacy Protection Act of
1994, 18 U.S.C. § 2721 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2015 2025.
(3) Motor vehicle registration information shall not be sold,
furnished, or used for solicitation purposes.
(b)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
and such officers of the Office of Motor Vehicle as the secretary may
designate are authorized to prepare under the seal of the Office of Motor
Vehicle and deliver upon request a certified copy of any record of the Office
of Motor Vehicle or a noncertified electronic copy of any record of the
Office of Motor Vehicle.
(2)(1) A fee of one dollar ($1.00) shall be charged for each
certified record authenticated.
(3)(2) Every certified copy shall be admissible in any
03/18/2025 9:13:56 AM MBM088

SB498
proceeding in any court in like manner as the original.
(4)(A)(3)(A) A party requesting a noncertified electronic record
shall execute a written agreement with the Department of Finance and
Administration that includes the following provisions:
(i) An acknowledgment that the party requesting a
record shall comply with all state and federal limits on the use of those
records; and
(ii) An agreement that the party seeking to obtain
records shall hold harmless and indemnify the department for any money
damages, punitive damages, criminal fines, civil penalties, court costs, and
attorney's fees awarded to any person or entity by any state or federal court
or by the Arkansas State Claims Commission resulting from any disclosure by
the party of motor vehicle information that is contrary to state or federal
law.
(B) A fee of not less than twenty dollars and fifty cents
($20.50) nor more than thirty dollars ($30.00) per one thousand (1,000)
records shall be charged for electronic records.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code §§ 27-19-406 and 27-19-407 are repealed.
27-19-406. Operating record to be furnished.
(a) The Office of Driver Services shall, upon request, furnish any
person a certified abstract of the operating record of any person subject to
the provisions of this chapter, which shall include enumeration of any motor
vehicle accidents in which the person has been involved and reference to any
convictions of the person for violation of the motor vehicle laws as reported
to the Office of Driver Services, and a record of any vehicles registered in
the name of the person.
(b) The Office of Driver Services shall collect for each abstract the
sum of fifty cents (50¢) for each page.

27-19-407. Public inspection of records.
All records of the Office of Driver Services shall be open to public
inspection at any reasonable time.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 27-50-906 is amended to read as follows:
27-50-906. Furnishing of abstracts — Definition Definitions.
03/18/2025 9:13:56 AM MBM088

SB498
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Abstract" means a report of the driver's personal
information and the driving status and history of a driver generated from the
driver record maintained by the Office of Driver Services, including without
limitation documents provided to the office by any federal, state, or local
court, law enforcement agency, or government agency;
(2) “Driver confirmation record” means information in the office
concerning the name, date of birth, and current address of the licensed
driver; and
(3) "Personal information" means information that identifies an
individual, including without limitation an individual's social security
number, driver identification number, name, address, and telephone number.
(a)(1)(b)(1) The Office of Driver Services may furnish an abstract or
driver confirmation record of any driver's record to:
(A) The driver on whom the record has been compiled;
(B) Any A person who has been authorized in writing by the
driver to obtain the driver's record;
(C) Any court having jurisdiction over traffic offenses A
federal, state, or local court for use in connection with a civil, criminal,
administrative, or arbitral proceeding, including without limitation use:
(i) In connection with the service of process;
(ii) In connection with the execution or enforcement
of a judgment or order; or
(iii) Pursuant to an order of a federal, state, or
local court;
(D) Any law enforcement officer, who shall use the report
only in the line of duty in enforcing the traffic laws of this state A duly
licensed attorney at law in response to a subpoena properly issued in a
federal, state, or local court action;
(E) Employers of drivers, provided that the driver has
given his or her written consent for the employer to obtain the driver's
record;
(F) Any An insurer licensed to do business in Arkansas or
its agents, employees, or contractors in connection with the driving record
or driver confirmation record of an insured or applicant and all licensed
drivers in the household of the insured or applicant; and
03/18/2025 9:13:56 AM MBM088

SB498
(G) A governmental department or agency upon a showing of
reasonable cause as to why the driver's record should be issued to the
governmental department or agency in order for the governmental department or
agency to effectively carry out its statutory duties A governmental agency or
law enforcement agency for use in carrying out its functions.
(2)(A) A driver's license status report shall be available to
rental car companies who otherwise meet the requirements of this section for
receiving an abstract of a driver's record upon the payment of one dollar
($1.00) for each license number checked. This fee shall be deposited to the
State Treasury into the State Central Services Fund as a direct revenue to be
used by the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(B) The Information Network of Arkansas may charge an
additional fee under the Information Network of Arkansas Act, § 25-27-101 et
seq., for the service of transmitting this information electronically.
(b) For purposes of this section, “driver confirmation record” means
information in the Office of Driver Services concerning the name, date of
birth, and current address of the licensed driver.
(c)(1)(A) The fee for an insured's or applicant's driver confirmation
record shall be ten cents (10¢) per record.
(B) This fee shall be deposited into the fund as a direct
revenue to be used by the division.
(2) The network may charge an additional fee under the
Information Network of Arkansas Act, § 25-27-101 et seq., for the service of
transmitting this information electronically.
(d) A recipient of an abstract or driver confirmation record under
this section may redisclose the information only for a use permitted under
this section.
(e) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may
promulgate rules and prescribe forms to implement this section.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 27-50-907 is amended to read as follows:
27-50-907. Availability of recorded information.
(a) All information concerning a driver's record shall be made
available to the driver or his or her legal representative.
(b)(1) Information such as medical reports or other personal
information shall not be a part of any written report the Office of Driver
03/18/2025 9:13:56 AM MBM088

SB498
Services may provide, nor shall the Office of Driver Services allow any
person to copy or reproduce such records.
(2) Information in the central drivers' records file concerning
the name, age, and current address of all drivers over the age of sixteen
(16) years and under the age of twenty-six (26) years shall be made available
to the Arkansas military recruiting coordinators for any of the United States
Armed Forces for distribution to their branch offices. The information shall
be available upon request of the military recruiting coordinators and may be
requested and updated up to two (2) times during any calendar year.
(c)(1) No The office may provide a digital driver's license photograph
shall be disclosed to any individual or organization, except upon the written
request for disclosure to a named individual or to a party by the person
whose photograph is on the driver's license:
(A)(i) To an individual or organization upon the written
request for disclosure by the person whose photograph is on the driver's
license.
(ii) A written request under subdivision
(c)(1)(A)(i) of this section shall name the individual or organization to
whom the digital driver's license photograph shall be provided;
(B) When disclosure of the digital driver's license
photograph is compelled by a court order or valid subpoena issued by a
federal, state or local court; or
(C) Upon the request of a federal, state, or local law
enforcement agency for use in carrying out its functions.
(2) A fee of five dollars ($5.00) shall be charged for each
digital driver's license photograph provided by the Office of Driver Services
office under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section.
(d) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may
promulgate rules and prescribe forms to implement this section.







03/18/2025 9:13:56 AM MBM088